pt-PT: Material de enchimento do shaker: Feijões; Grânulos de latão; Contas de cerâmica; Contas de vidro; Grânulos de metal; Seixos/pedras; Contas de plástico; Arroz; Areia; Sementes; Contas de aço; Contas de madeira; Outro
ro-RO: Material de umplere pentru shaker: Boabe; Bile de alamă; Mărgele din ceramică; Mărgele din sticlă; Bile de metal; Pietricele/pietre; Mărgele din plastic; Orez; Nisip; Semințe; Mărgele din oțel; Mărgele din lemn; Altele
es: Material de relleno del sonajero: Granos; Perdigones de latón; Cuentas de cerámica; Cuentas de vidrio; Perdigones de metal; Piedras/guijarros; Cuentas de plástico; Arroz; Arena; Semillas; Cuentas de acero; Cuentas de madera; Otro
ja: シェーカー充填材: 豆; 真鍮ショット; セラミックビーズ; ガラスビーズ; メタルショット; 小石/石; プラスチックビーズ; 米; 砂; 種子; スチールビーズ; ウッドビーズ; その他
it: Materiale di riempimento dello shaker: Fagioli; Pallini di ottone; Perline in ceramica; Perline di vetro; Pallini di metallo; Ciottoli/pietre; Perline di plastica; Riso; Sabbia; Semi; Perline d’acciaio; Perline di legno; Altro
zh-TW: 搖杯填充材質: 豆子; 黃銅砂; 陶瓷珠; 玻璃珠; 金屬砂; 卵石/石頭; 塑膠珠; 米; 沙; 種子; 鋼珠; 木珠; 其他
tr: Marakas dolgu malzemesi: Fasulye; Pirinç bilye; Seramik boncuk; Cam boncuk; Metal bilye; Çakıl/taş; Plastik boncuk; Pirinç; Kum; Tohum; Çelik boncuk; Ahşap boncuk; Diğer
sv: Fyllningsmaterial för shaker: Bönor; Mässingshagel; Keramiska pärlor; Glaspärlor; Metallhagel; Småsten/stenar; Plastpärlor; Ris; Sand; Frön; Stålpärlor; Träpärlor; Övrigt
nb: Fyllmateriale i risteinstrument: Bønner; Messinghagl; Keramikkperler; Glassperler; Metallhagl; Småstein/stein; Plastperler; Ris; Sand; Frø; Stålperler; Treperler; Annet
zh-CN: 沙锤填充材质: 豆子; 黄铜珠; 陶瓷珠; 玻璃珠; 金属珠; 卵石/石头; 塑料珠; 大米; 沙子; 种子; 钢珠; 木珠; 其他
fi: Rytmimunan täytemateriaali: Pavut; Messinkihaulit; Keraamiset helmet; Lasihelmet; Metallihaulit; Pikkukivet/kivet; Muovihelmet; Riisi; Hiekka; Siemenet; Teräshelmet; Puuhelmet; Muu
nl: Vulmateriaal shaker: Bonen; Messing hagel; Keramische kralen; Glazen kralen; Metalen hagel; Kiezels/stenen; Plastic kralen; Rijst; Zand; Zaden; Stalen kralen; Houten kralen; Overig
hr-HR: Materijal punjenja shakera: Grah; Mjedena sačma; Keramičke perle; Staklene perle; Metalna sačma; Šljunak/kamenčići; Plastične perle; Riža; Pijesak; Sjemenke; Čelične perle; Drvene perle; Drugo
da: Fyldmateriale i shaker: Bønner; Messinghagl; Keramikkugler; Glaskugler; Metalhagl; Småsten/sten; Plastikkugler; Ris; Sand; Frø; Stålkugler; Trækugler; Andet
ru: Материал наполнителя шейкера: Бобы; Латунная дробь; Керамические бусины; Стеклянные бусины; Металлическая дробь; Галька/камни; Пластиковые шарики; Рис; Песок; Семена; Стальные шарики; Деревянные шарики; Другое
pl: Materiał wypełnienia shakera: Fasola; Śrut mosiężny; Koraliki ceramiczne; Koraliki szklane; Śrut metalowy; Kamyki/kamienie; Koraliki plastikowe; Ryż; Piasek; Nasiona; Koraliki stalowe; Koraliki drewniane; Inne
en: Shaker fill material: Beans; Brass shot; Ceramic beads; Glass beads; Metal shot; Pebbles/stones; Plastic beads; Rice; Sand; Seeds; Steel beads; Wood beads; Other
pt-BR: Chocalho, material de enchimento: Feijões; Esferas de latão; Contas de cerâmica; Contas de vidro; Esferas de metal; Pedregulhos/pedras; Contas de plástico; Arroz; Areia; Sementes; Contas de aço; Contas de madeira; Outros
de: Füllmaterial des Shakers: Bohnen; Messingschrot; Keramikperlen; Glasperlen; Metallschrot; Kieselsteine/Steine; Kunststoffperlen; Reis; Sand; Samen; Stahlperlen; Holzperlen; Sonstige
cs: Materiál náplně šejkru: Fazole; Mosazné broky; Keramické kuličky; Skleněné kuličky; Kovové broky; Kamínky/kameny; Plastové kuličky; Rýže; Písek; Semínka; Ocelové kuličky; Dřevěné kuličky; Jiné
lt-LT: Barškučio užpildo medžiaga: Pupelės; Žalvario šratai; Keraminiai karoliukai; Stikliniai karoliukai; Metalo šratai; Akmenukai / akmenys; Plastikiniai karoliukai; Ryžiai; Smėlis; Sėklos; Plieniniai karoliukai; Mediniai karoliukai; Kita
fr: Matériau de remplissage pour shaker: Haricots; Grenaille de laiton; Billes en céramique; Billes en verre; Grenaille métallique; Cailloux/pierres; Billes en plastique; Riz; Sable; Graines; Billes en acier; Billes en bois; Autre
sl-SI: Polnilni material stresalnika: Fižol; Medeninaste kroglice; Keramične kroglice; Steklene kroglice; Kovinske kroglice; Prodniki/kamni; Plastične kroglice; Riž; Pesek; Semena; Jeklene kroglice; Lesene kroglice; Drugo
th: วัสดุบรรจุภายในกระบอกเขย่า: ถั่ว; เม็ดทองเหลือง; ลูกปัดเซรามิก; ลูกปัดแก้ว; เม็ดโลหะ; กรวด/หิน; ลูกปัดพลาสติก; ข้าวสาร; ทราย; เมล็ดพืช; ลูกปัดเหล็ก; ลูกปัดไม้; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Материал на пълнежа на шейкъра: Боб; Месингови сачми; Керамични мъниста; Стъклени мъниста; Метални сачми; Камъчета/камъни; Пластмасови мъниста; Ориз; Пясък; Семена; Стоманени мъниста; Дървени мъниста; Друго
hu: Shaker töltőanyaga: Bab; Sárgaréz sörét; Kerámiagyöngyök; Üveggyöngyök; Fémsörét; Kavicsok/kövek; Műanyag gyöngyök; Rizs; Homok; Magvak; Acélgyöngyök; Fagyöngyök; Egyéb
el: Υλικό πλήρωσης shaker: Φασόλια; Ορειχάλκινα σφαιρίδια; Κεραμικές χάντρες; Γυάλινες χάντρες; Μεταλλικά σφαιρίδια; Βότσαλα/πέτρες; Πλαστικές χάντρες; Ρύζι; Άμμος; Σπόροι; Ατσάλινες χάντρες; Ξύλινες χάντρες; Άλλο
vi: Chất liệu hạt nạp bên trong nhạc cụ lắc: Đậu; Bi đồng thau; Hạt gốm; Hạt thủy tinh; Bi kim loại; Sỏi/đá; Hạt nhựa; Gạo; Cát; Hạt giống; Hạt thép; Hạt gỗ; Khác
ko: 셰이커 충전재: 콩; 황동 산탄; 세라믹 비즈; 유리 비즈; 금속 산탄; 자갈/돌; 플라스틱 비즈; 쌀; 모래; 씨앗; 강철 비즈; 나무 비즈; 기타
sk-SK: Výplňový materiál šejkra: Fazuľa; Mosadzné guľôčky; Keramické koráliky; Sklenené koráliky; Kovové guľôčky; Kamienky/kamene; Plastové koráliky; Ryža; Piesok; Semená; Oceľové koráliky; Drevené koráliky; Iné